Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.040

Reports—Oral, written—Contents.

An immediate oral report must be made by telephone or otherwise to the proper law enforcement agency or the department and, upon request, must be followed by a report in writing. Such reports must contain the following information, if known:

(1) The name, address, and age of the child;

(2) The name and address of the child's parents, stepparents, guardians, or other persons having custody of the child;

(3) The nature and extent of the alleged injury or injuries;

(4) The nature and extent of the alleged neglect;

(5) The nature and extent of the alleged sexual abuse;

(6) Any evidence of previous injuries, including their nature and extent; and

(7) Any other information that may be helpful in establishing the cause of the child's death, injury, or injuries and the identity of the alleged perpetrator or perpetrators.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 323; 1999 c 176 s 32; 1997 c 386 s 27; 1993 c 412 s 14; 1987 c 206 s 4; 1984 c 97 s 4; 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 27; 1975 1st ex.s. c 217 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 167 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 35 s 4; 1965 c 13 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Findings—Purpose—Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—1999 c 176: See notes following RCW 74.34.005.

Application—Effective date—1997 c 386: See notes following RCW 13.50.010.

Purpose—Intent—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 80: See notes following RCW 4.16.190.